Wyoming statutes. Title 11 Agriculture, Livestock and Other Animals
Article 1. In General

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

4 Am. Jur. 2d Animals §§ 3, 6, 7, 20 to 30, 72 to 74, 87, 107 to 112, 116, 124, 127, 153, 165.

Civil liability of landowner for killing or injuring trespassing dog, 15 ALR2d 578.

Civil liability of landowner for killing or injuring trespassing dog attacking other animals, 15 ALR2d 578.

Constitutionality of statute or ordinance providing for destruction of dogs running at large, 56 ALR2d 1024.

Constitutionality of statute providing for destruction of dogs as affected by property rights in dogs, 56 ALR2d 1024.

Validity of statute or ordinance providing for destruction of dogs, 56 ALR2d 1024.

Liability for injury inflicted by dog exhibited at show, 80 ALR2d 886.

Dog owner's liability for damages from motor vehicle accident involving attempt to avoid collision with dog on highway, 41 ALR3d 888.

Liability of motorist for collision as affected by attempts to avoid dog or other small animal in road, 41 ALR3d 1124.

Liability of owner of dog known by him to be vicious for injuries to trespasser, 64 ALR3d 1039.

Liability of owner or operator of business premises for injury to patron by dog or cat, 67 ALR4th 976.

Liability for injuries caused by cat, 68 ALR4th 823.

Liability for injuries inflicted by dog on public officer or employee, 74 ALR4th 1120.

Landlord's liability to third person for injury resulting from attack on leased premises by dangerous or vicious animal kept by tenant, 87 ALR4th 1004.

Landlord's liability to third person for injury resulting from attack off leased premises by dangerous or vicious animal kept by tenant, 89 ALR4th 374.

Intentional provocation, contributory or comparative negligence, or assumption of risk as defense to action for injury by dog, 11 ALR5th 127.

3A C.J.S. Animals §§ 2 to 5, 99 to 116, 177 to 237, 249, 298 to 316.

§ 11-31-101.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1991,
ch. 4, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1888, ch. 79, § 1, related to the listing, assessing and taxing of dogs.

§ 11-31-102.
Deemed personalty.

Dogs are personal property
and the subject of theft the same as other
personal property. The value in any criminal prosecution shall be
determined as in other cases.

History.

Laws 1888, ch. 79, § 3; R.S. 1899, § 2671; C.S. 1910, § 2720; C.S. 1920, § 3239; R.S. 1931, § 6-201; C.S. 1945, § 56-2103; W.S. 1957, § 11-577; W.S. 1977, §

11-36-102

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1991, ch. 4, § 1; 2013 ch. 191, § 2, effective July 1, 2013.

Cross references. —

As to owner having no property rights in unlicensed dogs, see §

11-31-211

.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, substituted “theft” for “larceny.”

Dog as personal property for purposes of willful destruction
of property statute. —

A dog of a person living in an unincorporated area of a county, who is not required to license his dog, is personal property for purposes of the willful destruction of property statute. Irwin v. State, 658 P.2d 64,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 276

(Wyo. 1983).

§ 11-31-103.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1991,
ch. 4, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1888, ch. 79, § 2, related to the measure of damages for loss of a dog.

§ 11-31-104.
Penalties for poisoning or killing with ground glass.

Whoever within the limits
of any incorporated city or town willfully poisons or kills any dog
by means of ground glass is guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be fined
not less than one hundred dollars ($100.00) nor more than one thousand
dollars ($1,000.00), or imprisoned not less than one (1) month nor
more than one (1) year, or both.

History.

Laws 1945, ch. 116, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 56-2104; W.S. 1957, § 11-579; W.S. 1977, §

11-36-104

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1.

§ 11-31-105.
Killing sheep or other domestic animals; liability of owner.

The owner of any dog
is liable for all damages that accrue to any person, firm or corporation
by reason of the dog killing, wounding, worrying or chasing any sheep
or other domestic animals belonging to the person, firm or corporation.
If two (2) or more dogs owned by different persons kill, wound, chase
or worry any sheep or other domestic animals, the persons are jointly
and severally liable for all damage done by the dogs. Any person who
harbors about his premises a dog for twenty (20) days shall be taken
and held as the owner and is liable for all damages that the dog commits.

History.

Laws 1933, ch. 90, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 56-2105; W.S. 1957, § 11-580; W.S. 1977, §

11-36-105

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to dogs running livestock, see §§

11-31-107

and

11-31-108

.

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Wyoming Tort Reform and the Medical Malpractice Insurance Crisis: A Second Opinion,” see XXVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 593 (1993).

§ 11-31-106.
Killing sheep or other domestic animals; destruction.

Every person, firm, copartnership,
corporation or company owning any dog, which to his knowledge has
killed sheep or other livestock, shall exterminate and destroy the
dog.

History.

Laws 1933, Sp. Sess., ch. 27, § 2; C.S. 1945, § 56-2202; W.S. 1957, § 11-581; W.S. 1977, §

11-36-106

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1.

§ 11-31-107.
Running livestock; when killing authorized; liability to owner; exception.

Dogs running livestock
against the wish of the owner of the livestock may be killed at once
in cases where the livestock has been injured or is threatened with
injury. The person killing any dog running livestock is not liable
to the owner where the vicious character of the dog or the damage
or danger of damage is shown. When livestock is trespassing upon property
the property owner may use dogs to drive and keep off livestock from
the property.

History.

Laws 1890, ch. 39, § 29; R.S. 1899, § 2014; C.S. 1910, § 2622; C.S. 1920, § 3116; R.S. 1931, § 67-227; C.S. 1945, § 56-528; W.S. 1957, § 11-582; Laws 1965, ch. 14, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

11-36-107

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1.

§ 11-31-108.
Running livestock; penalty for permitting.

Any person who permits
or directs any dog owned by him or in his possession or in the possession
of his employee to chase or run any cattle or other livestock of which
he is not the owner and of which he is not in control, farther than
one hundred (100) yards from his land, upon government lands, or away
from any watering place upon the open range, shall be fined not less
than fifty dollars ($50.00) or more than seven hundred fifty dollars
($750.00), or imprisoned not more than six (6) months, or both.

History.

Laws 1913, ch. 2, § 1; C.S. 1920, § 3118; R.S. 1931, § 67-229; C.S. 1945, § 56-2106; W.S. 1957, § 11-583; W.S. 1977, §

11-36-108

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1981, ch. 98, § 2.